New York, session 2025-2026, S1606.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 205-ccc to read as follows: 3 § 205-ccc. Volunteer firefighter enhanced cancer disability benefit; 4 reimbursement. 1. Each fire district, department or company required to 5 provide enhanced cancer disability benefits for volunteer fire fighters 6 pursuant to section two hundred five-cc of this article shall be enti- 7 tled to reimbursement by the state for payments made in order to obtain 8 the insurance coverage necessary to satisfy the requirements of such 9 section. 10 2. Each fire district, department or company required to provide 11 enhanced cancer disability benefits pursuant to section two hundred 12 five-cc of this article shall be eligible for an annual reimbursement 13 upon application, which must include proof of such policies held by a 14 district, department or company, to the office of fire prevention and 15 control. The office of fire prevention and control shall make determi- 16 nations related to approving or denying submitted applications and issue 17 appropriate reimbursements. 18 3. The office of fire prevention and control, in conjunction with the 19 department of financial services, shall establish a uniform application EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02555-01-5 S. 1606 2 1 process for reimbursement, and shall promulgate rules and regulations 2 necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. 3 4. The amount of the reimbursement shall be limited to the amount each 4 district, department or company spent in the prior fiscal year in order 5 to obtain insurance coverage necessary to comply with section two 6 hundred five-cc of this article. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 8 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately 9 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 10 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 11 authorized to be made and completed on or before such date.